Connecticut, session 2026, HB05237.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 14-10 of the 2026
2 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
3 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (2) "Motor vehicle record" means any record that pertains to an
5 operator's license, instruction or learner's permit, identity card,
6 registration, certificate of title or any other document issued by the
7 Department of Motor Vehicles; [. "Motor vehicle record" does not
8 include any record relating to vessels and certificates of title for vessels,
9 as provided in section 15-210;]
10 Sec. 2. Subsection (f) of section 14-10 of the 2026 supplement to the
11 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
12 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
13 (f) The commissioner may disclose personal information from a
14 motor vehicle record to:
HB5237 / File No. 410 1

HB5237 File No. 410
15 (1) Any federal, state or local government agency in carrying out its
16 functions or to any individual or entity acting on behalf of any such
17 agency, [or]
18 (2) Any individual, organization or entity that signs and files with the
19 commissioner, under penalty of false statement as provided in section
20 53a-157b, a statement on a form approved by the commissioner,
21 together with such supporting documentation or information as the
22 commissioner may require, that such information will be used for any
23 of the following purposes:
24 (A) In connection with matters of motor vehicle or driver safety and
25 theft, motor vehicle emissions, motor vehicle product alterations, recalls
26 or advisories, performance monitoring of motor vehicles and dealers by
27 motor vehicle manufacturers, motor vehicle market research activities
28 including survey research, motor vehicle product and service
29 communications and removal of nonowner records from the original
30 owner records of motor vehicle manufacturers to implement the
31 provisions of the federal Automobile Information Disclosure Act, 15
32 USC 1231 et seq., the Clean Air Act, 42 USC 7401 et seq., and 49 USC
33 Chapters 301, 305 and 321 to 331, inclusive, as amended from time to
34 time, and any provision of the general statutes enacted to attain
35 compliance with said federal provisions;
36 (B) In the normal course of business by the requesting party, but only
37 to confirm the accuracy of personal information submitted by the
38 individual to the requesting party;
39 (C) In connection with any civil, criminal, administrative or arbitral
40 proceeding in any court or government agency or before any self-
41 regulatory body, including the service of process, an investigation in
42 anticipation of litigation by an attorney-at-law or any individual acting
43 on behalf of an attorney-at-law and the execution or enforcement of
44 judgments and orders, or pursuant to an order of any court provided
45 the requesting party is a party in interest to such proceeding;
46 (D) In connection with matters of motor vehicle or driver safety and
HB5237 / File No. 410 2

HB5237 File No. 410
47 theft, motor vehicle emissions, motor vehicle product alterations, recalls
48 or advisories, performance monitoring of motor vehicles and motor
49 vehicle parts and dealers, producing statistical reports and removal of
50 nonowner records from the original owner records of motor vehicle
51 manufacturers, provided the personal information is not published,
52 disclosed or used to contact individuals except as permitted under
53 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision;
54 (E) By any insurer or insurance support organization or by a self-
55 insured entity or its agents, employees or contractors, in connection
56 with the investigation of claims arising under insurance policies,
57 antifraud activities, rating or underwriting;
58 (F) In providing any notice required by law to owners or lienholders
59 named in the certificate of title of towed, abandoned or impounded
60 motor vehicles;
61 (G) By an employer or its agent or insurer to obtain or verify
62 information relating to a holder of a passenger endorsement or
63 commercial driver's license required under 49 USC Chapter 313, and
64 sections 14-44 to 14-44m, inclusive;
65 (H) In connection with any lawful purpose of a labor organization, as
66 defined in section 31-77, provided (i) such organization has entered into
67 a contract with the commissioner, on such terms and conditions as the
68 commissioner may require, and (ii) the information will be used only for
69 the purposes specified in the contract other than campaign or political
70 purposes;
71 (I) For bulk distribution for surveys, marketing or solicitations
72 provided the commissioner has obtained the express consent of the
73 individual to whom such personal information pertains;
74 (J) For the purpose of preventing fraud by verifying the accuracy of
75 personal information contained in a motor vehicle record, including an
76 individual's photograph or computerized image, as submitted by an
77 individual to a legitimate business or an agent, employee or contractor
HB5237 / File No. 410 3

HB5237 File No. 410
78 of a legitimate business, provided the individual has provided express
79 consent in accordance with subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this
80 section;
81 (K) Inclusion of personal information about persons who have
82 indicated consent to become organ and tissue donors in a donor registry
83 established by a procurement organization, as defined in section 19a-
84 289a;
85 (L) By any private detective or private detective licensed in
86 accordance with the provisions of chapter 534, in connection with an
87 investigation involving matters concerning motor vehicles;
88 (M) By a state marshal, for use in the performance of duties under the
89 provisions of section 6-38a. Such information including, but not limited
90 to, (i) operator photos, and (ii) records produced by providing an
91 operator's license number, number plate or vehicle identification
92 number, may be requested and provided to a state marshal
93 electronically, or by such other means, within a reasonable time. Such
94 records may be transmitted to a state marshal by means of an existing
95 electronic system used by the Department of Motor Vehicles for the
96 transmission of records. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may
97 charge a state marshal a reasonable annual fee for access to such records
98 and the use of such electronic system, or
99 (3) Any individual who provides proof of current ownership of a
100 vessel for the purpose of obtaining the name and address of the last
101 person who registered such vessel.
102 Sec. 3. Subsection (h) of section 14-10 of the 2026 supplement to the
103 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
104 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
105 (h) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the disclosure of
106 personal information from a motor vehicle record pursuant to
107 subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (f) of this section shall be subject to
108 the provisions of section 14-50a concerning (1) the fees that shall be
HB5237 / File No. 410 4

HB5237 File No. 410
109 charged for copies of or information pertaining to motor vehicle records,
110 and (2) the authority of the commissioner to establish fees for
111 information furnished on a volume basis in accordance with such terms
112 and conditions regarding the use and distribution of such information
113 as the commissioner may prescribe.
114 Sec. 4. Subsection (a) of section 15-144 of the general statutes is
115 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
116 1, 2026):
117 (a) (1) Any owner desiring to obtain a vessel registration number or
118 registration decal shall apply to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles
119 and shall file such proof of ownership of the vessel as the commissioner
120 may require. Upon receipt of an application in proper form and the
121 numbering fee, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall assign a
122 registration number or registration decal and provide the owner with a
123 temporary certificate of number or temporary certificate of decal. The
124 Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall issue two registration decals and
125 a permanent certificate.
126 (2) A registration decal shall be displayed on each side of the vessel
127 at the bow in a manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Energy and
128 Environmental Protection. The certificate shall state the name of the
129 owner, [his] the owner's address, a description of the vessel, its hull
130 identification number, the expiration date of the certificate and such
131 other information as the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
132 Protection may prescribe by regulations. Such certificate shall be carried
133 aboard and shall be available for inspection upon the vessel for which it
134 is issued whenever the owner or any person authorized by [him] the
135 owner is aboard such vessel, except that the certificate of number for a
136 vessel which is less than twenty-six feet and which is rented for
137 noncommercial purposes for less than twenty-four hours may be
138 retained on shore by the owner of such vessel or [his] the owner's agent
139 at the place where such vessel departs or returns. If such certificate is
140 retained on shore, a rental agreement signed by the owner or [his] the
141 owner's agent and by the person renting the vessel shall be carried
HB5237 / File No. 410 5

HB5237 File No. 410
142 aboard such vessel and shall be available for inspection. Such rental
143 agreement shall contain the vessel number which appears on the
144 certificate of number and the length of time for which such vessel is
145 rented.
146 (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 1-217 and 14-10, as
147 amended by this act, the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
148 Protection may disclose, at no cost, the name and address of the last
149 person who registered a vessel to any individual who provides proof of
150 current ownership of such vessel.
151 Sec. 5. Subsection (h) of section 15-144 of the general statutes is
152 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
153 1, 2026):
154 (h) (1) Any person who operates or any owner who permits the
155 operation of a vessel on the waters of this state which has not been
156 numbered or registered in accordance with the provisions of this
157 chapter and any other applicable section of the general statutes shall
158 have committed a violation and shall be fined not less than twenty-five
159 dollars or more than two hundred dollars for the first offense and for
160 each subsequent offense shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars
161 or more than five hundred dollars. (2) No person shall use any vessel
162 registration or registration decals that have been issued to another
163 person pursuant to this section and sections 15-142 [to 15-144, inclusive]
164 and 15-143. No person shall use a vessel registration or registration
165 decals on any vessel other than the vessel for which such registration
166 number or registration decals have been issued. Any person who
167 violates any provision of this subdivision shall be fined not more than
168 two hundred fifty dollars. (3) Any officer empowered to enforce the
169 provisions of this chapter and any other applicable section of the general
170 statutes who finds a vessel which is not numbered or registered in
171 accordance with the provisions of this chapter and such discovery is
172 subsequent to a violation of this chapter may make application to the
173 court for a warrant to seize such vessel and take it into custody pending
174 proof of payment of proper numbering or registration fees. No officer
HB5237 / File No. 410 6

HB5237 File No. 410
175 shall be liable for any act performed under the provisions of this
176 subsection.
177 Sec. 6. Subsection (a) of section 14-15e of the 2026 supplement to the
178 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
179 thereof (Effective from passage):
180 (a) (1) For the purposes of this section, "Commissioner of Motor
181 Vehicles" or "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Motor
182 Vehicles or any employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles who is
183 acting for, or on behalf of, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.
184 [(a) (1)] (2) Except as provided in subdivision [(2)] (3) of this
185 subsection, no person, firm or corporation shall engage in the business
186 of electronically filing applications for the issuance of a certificate of
187 registration or a certificate of title for motor vehicles with the
188 Department of Motor Vehicles, unless such person, firm or corporation
189 holds an electronic issuance license issued by the Commissioner of
190 Motor Vehicles.
191 [(2)] (3) A motor vehicle dealer licensed in accordance with section
192 14-52 and acting pursuant to subsection (c) of section 14-12, subsection
193 (b) of section 14-61 or section 14-61a, a person, firm or corporation
194 engaging in the business of leasing or renting motor vehicles without
195 drivers in this state and acting pursuant to section 14-15 or a contractor
196 authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of section 14-41, may use the
197 department's electronic system for filing applications for the issuance of
198 a certificate of registration or certificate of title, as the case may be,
199 without obtaining an electronic issuance license. The commissioner
200 shall not issue an electronic issuance license to any such motor vehicle
201 dealer, person, firm or corporation or contractor.
202 [(3)] (4) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may require any
203 person, firm or corporation that files, on average, five or more
204 applications for the issuance of a certificate of registration or a certificate
205 of title for motor vehicles each month with the Department of Motor
206 Vehicles to file such applications electronically and obtain an electronic
HB5237 / File No. 410 7

HB5237 File No. 410
207 issuance license. Any such person, firm or corporation that fails or
208 refuses to file an application for such issuance electronically upon the
209 request of the commissioner shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars to the
210 commissioner for each such application submitted.
211 Sec. 7. Section 14-52a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
212 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
213 passage):
214 (a) For the purposes of this section, "Commissioner of Motor
215 Vehicles" or "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Motor
216 Vehicles or any employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles who is
217 acting for, or on behalf of, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.
218 [(a)] (b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may, after notice and
219 hearing, refuse to grant or renew a license to a person, firm or
220 corporation to engage in the business of selling or repairing motor
221 vehicles pursuant to the provisions of section 14-52 if any individual
222 named in an application for the issuance of such license has been found
223 liable in a civil action for odometer fraud or operating a dealer, repairer
224 or motor vehicle recycler business without a license, convicted of a
225 violation of any provision of laws pertaining to the business of a motor
226 vehicle dealer or repairer, including a motor vehicle recycler, or
227 convicted of any violation of any provision of laws involving fraud,
228 larceny or deprivation or misappropriation of property, in the courts of
229 the United States or any state. Upon renewal of such license, a licensee
230 shall make full disclosure of any such civil judgment or conviction
231 under penalty of false statement. Each individual named in an
232 application, on a form as prescribed by the commissioner, for the
233 issuance of such a license shall submit to fingerprint-based state and
234 national criminal history records checks conducted in accordance with
235 section 29-17a. The commissioner may require a person, firm or
236 corporation to submit its application electronically.
237 [(b)] (c) The commissioner shall not, after notice and hearing, grant
238 or renew a license to an applicant for or the holder of a used car dealer's
239 license that is delinquent in the payment of sales tax in connection with
HB5237 / File No. 410 8

HB5237 File No. 410
240 a business from which it is or was obligated to remit sales tax, as
241 reported to the commissioner by the Department of Revenue Services.
242 Sec. 8. Subsection (a) of section 14-73 of the 2026 supplement to the
243 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
244 thereof (Effective from passage):
245 (a) (1) For the purposes of this section, "Commissioner of Motor
246 Vehicles" or "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Motor
247 Vehicles or any employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles who is
248 acting for, or on behalf of, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.
249 [(a) (1)] (2) No person shall be employed by a drivers' school to give
250 instruction in driving a motor vehicle unless such person is licensed to
251 act as an instructor or master instructor by the Commissioner of Motor
252 Vehicles.
253 [(2)] (3) The drivers' school employing an instructor's licensee or a
254 master instructor's licensee shall be responsible for ensuring any such
255 licensee is in compliance with the requirements of this part and any
256 regulations adopted under section 14-78.
257 Sec. 9. Section 14-178 of the general statutes is repealed and the
258 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
259 (a) If a certificate of title of a vehicle is lost, stolen, mutilated or
260 destroyed or becomes illegible, the first lienholder or, if none, the owner
261 or legal representative of the owner named in the certificate, as shown
262 by the records of the commissioner, shall promptly make application for
263 and may obtain a replacement upon furnishing information, including
264 personal identification acceptable and satisfactory to the commissioner.
265 Upon receiving an application for a replacement, the commissioner shall
266 check the identification number of the vehicle shown in the application
267 against the record of vehicles required to be maintained by section 14-
268 173 and against the record of stolen and converted vehicles required to
269 be maintained by section 14-197.
270 (b) The replacement certificate of title shall contain the legend "This
HB5237 / File No. 410 9

HB5237 File No. 410
271 is a replacement title and may be subject to the rights of a person under
272 the original certificate." Except as provided in subsection (b) of section
273 14-175, the commissioner shall present or mail the replacement
274 certificate to the first lienholder named in the replacement certificate or,
275 if none, to the owner.
276 [(b)] (c) A person recovering an original certificate of title for which a
277 replacement has been issued shall promptly surrender the original
278 certificate to the commissioner.
279 Sec. 10. Subsection (a) of section 10-29a of the 2026 supplement to the
280 general statutes is amended by adding subdivision (139) as follows
281 (Effective from passage):
282 (NEW) (139) The Governor shall proclaim the second Monday in July
283 of each year as Accessible Parking Awareness Day, to promote the value
284 of accessible parking, encourage responsible use of accessible parking
285 spaces and strengthen public education and collaboration. Suitable
286 exercises may be held in the State Capitol and elsewhere as the
287 Governor designates for the observance of the day.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 14-10(a)(2)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 14-10(f)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 14-10(h)
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 15-144(a)
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 15-144(h)
Sec. 6 from passage 14-15e(a)
Sec. 7 from passage 14-52a
Sec. 8 from passage 14-73(a)
Sec. 9 October 1, 2026 14-178
Sec. 10 from passage 10-29a(a)(139)
TRA Joint Favorable
HB5237 / File No. 410 10

HB5237 File No. 410
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes changes to the motor vehicle statues that are either
minor, technical, or otherwise do not have a fiscal impact. It also
requires the governor to proclaim the second Monday in July each year
as Accessible Parking Awareness Day, which does not have a fiscal
impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5237 / File No. 410 11

HB5237 File No. 410
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5237
AN ACT IMPLEMENTING RECOMMENDATIONS BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES.